Tennessee, session 114, HB0425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-703, is amended by deleting
the language "within ten (10) days after it is issued".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0425
000463
- 1 -